North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8. Evidence.
Article 7A. Restrictions on Evidence in Rape Cases. [Repealed]

§§ 8-58.6 through 8-58.11.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983 (Regular Session, 1984), c. 1037, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to evidence in rape or sex offense cases, see

G.S. 8C-1

, Rule 412.

As to admissibility of evidence of reputation and prior convictions in prostitution cases, see

G.S. 14-206

.